Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.130

Operating without license—Injunction.

(1) Notwithstanding the existence or use of any other remedy, the department may in the manner provided by law, upon the advice of the attorney general who shall represent the department in all proceedings, maintain an action in the name of the state for an injunction or other process against any person to restrain or prevent the advertisement, operation, maintenance, management, or opening of a birthing center not licensed under this chapter.

(2) The injunction shall not relieve the person operating a birth center without a license from criminal prosecution, or the imposition of a civil fine under RCW 18.46.056, but the remedy by injunction shall be in addition to any criminal liability or civil fine. A person that violates an injunction issued under this chapter shall pay a civil penalty, as determined by the court, of not more than $25,000, which shall be deposited in the department's local fee account. For the purpose of this section, the superior court issuing any injunction shall retain jurisdiction and the cause shall be continued, and in such cases the attorney general acting in the name of the state may petition for the recovery of civil penalties. All fines, forfeitures, and penalties collected or assessed by a court because of a violation of RCW 18.46.020 shall be deposited in the department's local fee account.

[ 2024 c 121 s 4; 2000 c 93 s 39; 1951 c 168 s 14.]

NOTES:

Injunctions: Chapter 7.40 RCW.